Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 3 General Fees

Cross references. —

As to disposition of fees and taxes on vehicles and gasoline, see art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to gasoline taxes, see §

39-14-201

et seq.

As to sales tax on motor vehicles and trailers, see § 39-15-103(a)(i)(M).

As to use tax on motor vehicles and trailers, see §

39-16-103

.

§ 31-3-101.
Registration fees; exemptions.

Except as otherwise provided, the following fees shall accompany each application for the registration of a vehicle:

A county registration fee computed as follows, or five dollars ($5.00), whichever is greater:

3% of 60% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its first year of service;

3% of 50% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its second year of service;

3% of 40% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its third year of service;

3% of 30% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its fourth year of service;

3% of 20% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its fifth year of service;

3% of 15% of the factory price plus special equipment value for a vehicle in its sixth year of service and thereafter.

A state registration fee computed as follows:

Passenger cars . . . . . $30.00

School buses . . . . . $25.00

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 128, § 2.

Motorcycles, autocycles and multipurpose vehicles . . . . . $25.00

House trailers and other noncommercial vehicles based on unladen weight, which for purposes of this subparagraph only, shall be by the manufacturer’s published weight, if available:

1,000 pounds or less . . . . . $ 5.00

1,001 to 3,500 pounds . . . . . $30.00

3,501 to 4,500 pounds . . . . . $40.00

4,501 to 5,500 pounds . . . . . $50.00

5,501 to 6,000 pounds . . . . . $70.00

6,001 pounds or more . . . . . $90.00

Commercial vehicles, except passenger cars, school buses, house trailers, multipurpose vehicles, autocycles and motorcycles for which the fees shall be computed based on gross vehicle weight pursuant to W.S.

31-18-401

;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

Commercial vehicles being operated as a combination of two (2) or more vehicles shall be registered on the gross combined weight and pay fees as prescribed by W.S.

31-18-401

(a)(ii)(A) and 31-18-401(a)(iii).

Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 31-18-201(d)(iii), an equalized highway use tax collected by the department in lieu of the county registration fee imposed by paragraph (a)(i) of this section for commercial vehicles or fleets proportionally registered under W.S. 31-18-201(d)(ii);

As used in this subsection, “special equipment value” shall not include any value from an assistive device.

The fees prescribed by subsection (a) of this section are modified for owners of the following vehicles:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 90, § 2.

War veteran owners of vehicles entitled to exemptions pursuant to W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and

39-13-105

may claim unused exemptions against the fees prescribed by paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 90, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Any veteran as defined by W.S.

39-13-105

(a) who was a prisoner of war while serving in the armed forces of the United States is exempt from the fees provided by subsection (a) of this section for one (1) vehicle owned by the claimant. In order to receive the exemption, the claimant shall file with the county treasurer a sworn claim at the time of registration indicating the claimant’s right to the exemption. County assessors shall file notice of the number of exemptions granted and revenue lost in the same manner provided by W.S. 39-13-102(k);

Fees prescribed in subsection (a) of this section for vehicles not previously qualified for operation in this state are reduced by the proportionate share of the year prior to first operation if the vehicles have not been illegally operated on the highways of this state prior to application for registration;

A farmer, rancher, logger or well servicer who owns a commercial vehicle or combination of commercial vehicles operated by him or his employees primarily in agricultural operations, logging operations from the source to the mill, or in the servicing of well field operations and registered with the county treasurer under W.S. 31-18-201(b)(ii) shall pay twenty-five percent (25%) of the fee prescribed in subparagraph (a)(ii)(F) of this section;

An owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles registered with the county treasurer under W.S. 31-18-201(b)(ii), except for a vehicle owner whose fee is modified pursuant to paragraph (viii) of this subsection, shall pay a percentage of the state registration fee prescribed by subparagraph (a)(ii)(F) of this section as provided in the table below if the owner states under oath on a form prescribed and furnished by the department that the owner will not operate the vehicle or combination of vehicles more than the applicable number of miles stated in the table below on highways in the calendar year of registration:

NUMBER OF MILES OPERATED PERCENTAGE OF STATE FEE 2,500 miles or less 15% 2,501 to 5,000 20% 5,001 to 10,000 miles 25% 10,001 to 20,000 miles 50% 20,001 to 30,000 miles 75%

Click to view

The department shall prescribe by rule and regulation a means to identify conspicuously the vehicle or combination of vehicles for which a percentage of the state fee is paid at the time of registration pursuant to paragraphs (viii) and (ix) of this subsection. The department shall furnish the means of identification to each county treasurer to be issued at the time of registration. The vehicle owner shall display the means of identification as required by rules and regulations of the department. Failure to display the identification as required shall result in the penalties provided by law for failure to display a license plate;

If an owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles who pays a percentage of the state fee pursuant to paragraph (ix) of this subsection desires to increase the authorized amount of mileage for which the vehicle or combination of vehicles is registered, he shall pay an additional fee equal to the fee due for the additional amount of miles less the amount of fee paid at the time of registration. If the department determines through an audit, a verification of mileage statements or other means that the owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles has exceeded the authorized amount of mileage, an additional fee shall be due equal to twice the amount that should have been paid for the actual amount of miles driven less the fee paid pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (ix) of this subsection;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

A vehicle designed and used exclusively for the purpose of removing, towing or transporting wrecked, disabled or replacement vehicles incidental to an accidentally wrecked or disabled vehicle shall be considered a single unit and the fees prescribed by subparagraph (a)(ii)(F) and paragraph (a)(iii) of this section shall be based only on the gross weight of the towing vehicle;

From and after January 1, 1993, vehicles owned and primarily operated by an enrolled member of the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho Indian tribe who resides within the exterior boundaries of the state of Wyoming on the Wind River Indian Reservation or on other Indian country as defined by 18 U.S.C. § 1151 are exempt from fees provided by paragraph (a)(i) of this section. To receive the exemption, at the time of first registering the vehicle for which the owner qualifies for the exemption under this paragraph, the claimant shall file a sworn claim with the county treasurer indicating the claimant’s right to the exemption. If the claimant ceases to be an enrolled tribal member or ceases to reside within an area under this paragraph that creates the claimant’s right to the exemption under this paragraph, the claimant shall pay fees as required under paragraph (a)(i) of this section beginning when the vehicle’s annual registration is next due following the change in eligibility. County treasurers shall file notice of the exemptions granted and revenue lost and may be reimbursed by the state treasurer for all or a portion of revenue lost from funds appropriated for that purpose, in the same manner and subject to the same time limitation as provided for veteran exemptions under W.S. 39-13-102(k). The department, in consultation with the state treasurer, shall prescribe forms and procedures necessary to implement this paragraph. A vehicle registration issued under this paragraph shall indicate that the claimant received the exemption and shall include the text, “IF A CLAIMANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR THIS TRIBAL MEMBER RESIDENTIAL EXEMPTION CHANGES, THE CLAIMANT SHALL NOTIFY THE COUNTY TREASURER WITHIN SIXTY (60) DAYS OF THE CHANGE.” When an annual registration for a vehicle registered under this section is due to be renewed the county treasurer shall notify a claimant of the duty to inform the county treasurer if the claimant is no longer eligible for this exemption;

A disabled veteran who receives fifty percent (50%) or more service connected disability compensation from the United States department of veteran’s affairs is exempt from the fees imposed under subsection (a) of this section for one (1) vehicle owned by the claimant for which the claimant qualifies for a license plate in accordance with W.S.

31-2-215

. County treasurers shall file notice with the department of revenue of the number of exemptions granted and the fiscal impact on revenues.

When a factory price or special equipment value is not available for the computation of fees as required by this act an affidavit of valuation executed by the owner may be accepted. When an affidavit is presented for a homemade trailer or homemade special equipment, an affidavit of valuation executed by the owner may be accepted but the valuation given shall not be less than the actual cost of construction of the trailer or homemade special equipment. The county clerk or treasurer may also utilize a valuation for any trailer set by the county assessor. In no event shall any special equipment for which a registration has been issued be assessed for property taxation purposes pursuant to W.S.

39-13-103

.

The fees prescribed by subsection (a) of this section collected for the registration of a vehicle are in lieu of taxes provided by W.S.

39-13-101

through

39-13-111

.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 93, § 3.

Owners of the following vehicles are exempt from the payment of fees provided by subsections (a) and (b) of this section:

Vehicles owned by the United States, state of Wyoming, county, city, town or political subdivision of Wyoming or a joint powers board created under W.S.

16-1-101

through

16-1-109

, or vehicles owned by an irrigation district created under W.S.

41-7-201

through

41-7-210

or vehicles owned by a weed and pest control district created under W.S.

11-5-101

et seq. provided the vehicles are essential to the operation and maintenance of the district and are used for no business or commercial activity unrelated to the operation and maintenance of the district, or vehicles owned by a senior citizen center that is providing services to senior citizens under W.S.

18-2-105

;

Motor vehicles which have not been operated or driven upon Wyoming highways during the registration year upon the verified affidavit by the owner stating facts entitling him to relief;

Antique motor vehicles if registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-223

;

Vehicles held for sale by licensed Wyoming dealers or manufacturers.

Any owner of a vehicle who wishes to donate money to promote awareness and education efforts for procurement of organ and tissue donations for anatomical gifts shall be provided space on the registration form to do so pursuant to W.S. 31-2-225(a)(v). Any money received under this subsection shall be forwarded by the county treasurer to the state treasurer to be deposited into a separate account to be used as provided by W.S.

35-5-225

.

Any owner of a vehicle who wishes to donate money to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system shall be provided space on the registration form to do so pursuant to W.S. 31-2-225(a)(vi). Revenues collected under this subsection shall be forwarded by the county treasurer to the state treasurer to be deposited into the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1987, ch. 90, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 7, § 2; ch. 129, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 93, §§ 1 to 3; 1991, ch. 20, § 1; 1992, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 2; 1994, ch. 44, § 1; 1995, ch. 146, § 2; 1997, ch. 54, § 1; ch. 154, § 3; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 43, § 1; 2000, ch. 75, § 2; 2001, ch. 18, § 1; 2005, ch. 37, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; ch. 97, § 2; 2013 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 128, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2017 ch. 210, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to limitation on imposition of fees by local authorities, see §

31-5-110

.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (b)(xv).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (h), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the special revenue fund.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, amends (a)(ii) by inserting “and multipurpose vehicles” in (D); and making a similar change in (F).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch. 16, §§ 2 and 4, effective January 1, 2010,
inserted “plus special equipment value” in (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(F); repealed former (a)(ii)(G), which pertained to equipped vehicles and fees; repealed former (b)(xii), which pertained to fees prescribed in subparagraph (a)(ii)(F) and paragraph (a)(iii); in (c), substituted “a” for “no” near the beginning, inserted all references to special equipment or homemade special equipment value, and added the last sentence; substituted “have not been” for “will not be” in (g)(ii); added “if registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-223

” in (g)(iii); and substituted “31-2-225(a)(v)” for “31-2-201(b)(v)” in the first sentence of (h).

The second amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “35-5-225” for “35-5-118“ in the last sentence of (h).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iv).

The 2014 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015, in (a)(ii)(E), substituted “Other noncommercial vehicles based on unladen weight” for “House trailers and other noncommercial vehicles based on unladen weight, which for purposes of this subparagraph only, shall be by the manufacturer's published weight, if available”; and repealed former (a)(ii)(C) which read: “House trailers
. . . . .
$15.00.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xv), combined and rewrote the former first and second sentences, which read: “A disabled veteran who receives fifty percent (50%) or more service connected disability compensation from the United States department of veteran's affairs is exempt from the fees imposed under subsection (a) of this section for one (1) vehicle, other than a bus or motor home, owned by the claimant. Application for the exemption under this paragraph shall be in accordance with
W.S.

31-2-215

.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 165, § 1, in (a)(ii)(D) added “autocycles” and substituted “25.00” for “12.00,” in (a)(ii)(F) added “autocycles” following “multipurpose vehicles”; and made related changes.

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 210, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii)(A) substituted “30.00” for “15.00,” in (a)(ii)(B) substituted “25.00” for “10.00,” in (a)(ii)(C) substituted “25.00” for “12.00,” in (a)(ii)(E)(I) substituted “5.00” for “2.00,” in (a)(ii)(E)(II) substituted “30.00” for “15.00,” in (a)(ii)(E)(III) substituted “40.00” for “20.00,” in (a)(ii)(E)(IV) substituted “50.00” for “30.00,” in (a)(ii)(E)(V) substituted “70.00” for “40.00,” and in (a)(ii)(E)(VI) substituted “90.00” for “60.00.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (j).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (b)(xiv), rewrote the second sentence, which read, "In order to receive the exemption,
the claimant shall file a sworn claim with the county treasurer at the time of registration indicating the claimant's right to the exemption" and added the third, sixth and seventh sentences.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 98, §§ 2 and 4(c) amended
§ 31-3-101(a)(ii)(f) and (iii) effective January 1, 1994 only if 1993 Senate File No. 0042 was not enacted and did not become law. Senate File No. 0042 was enacted as Laws 1993, ch. 68.

Laws 2015, ch. 93, § 1 purported to amend (a)(xv); the amendment is set out to (b)(xv) by direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (c), see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Municipality may only impose regulatory fees. —

In view of this section, no fee, except at most one which is regulatory and which, accordingly, must not be disproportionate to expense involved, may be charged by a municipality on motor vehicles. Western Auto Transps. v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 351, 118 P.2d 761,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1941).

Registration fees not paid on dealer-owned vehicles. —

For the most part, registration fees are not paid by any taxpayer for the period of time a motor vehicle is owned by a dealer and held by him for sale. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

But automobile dealers are not exempted from the payment of inventory taxes,

because they are not included in the class of owners referred to in this section. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

Exemption limited to owner subject to registration fees. —

The language employed in subsection (d) seems to limit the exemption from all other taxes to the owner upon whom registration fees have been imposed, he only being the grantee of the exemption. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

And it cannot pass to a vendee or other owner,

whether he be a dealer or some other person. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

Unless vendee makes registration. —

In the case of a purchaser who is not a dealer, he of course makes a registration, and he thereby obtains exemption from other taxes. State Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming Auto. Dealers Ass'n, 395 P.2d 741,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 31-3-102.
Miscellaneous fees.

The following fees shall be collected for the instruments or privileges indicated:

Distinctive license plates indicating public ownership issued to
governmental agencies . . . . . Cost

License plates not indicating public ownership issued to
governmental agencies . . . . . No Fee

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 207, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

and (B) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 67, § 1.

All demo or manufacturer license plates . . . . . $25.00

and (B) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 67, § 1.

(C)

Full use plates
. . . . .
$125.00

Duplicate certificate of registration . . . . . $4.00

New license plates upon loss, mutilation or destruction of initial plates . . . . . $8.00

New validation stickers upon loss, mutilation or destruction of
initial stickers . . . . . $6.00

Duplicate license plates that have to be produced for prestige, specialty and preferred number series plates upon loss, mutilation or destruction of initial license plates . . . . . $30.00

Certificate of title, original or duplicate . . . . . $15.00

Personalized license plates, payable only if plates are issued . . . . . $30.00

Dealer certificate, each principal place of business within each county . . . . . $100.00

Temporary license permits . . . . . Cost

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Following transfer of ownership of a vehicle between two (2) or more
joint owners, or by an owner to his spouse, child, brother, sister or parent
for new registration . . . . . $4.00

Antique motor vehicles

Initial license plates . . . . . $10.00

Transfer of license plates . . . . . $2.00

Radio amateur license plates . . . . . $30.00

Loaded vehicle demonstration permit under W.S. 31-18-404(d) . . . . . $15.00

Demonstration permit under W.S. 31-2-201(n) . . . . . $10.00

Manufacturer certificate, each established place of business . . . . . $100.00

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 48, § 2.

Street rod . . . . . $100.00

Custom vehicle . . . . . $100.00

Optional embossed license plates . . . . . $50.00

An annual decal which shall include the bucking horse and rider emblem for a plug-in registered and licensed electric vehicle as defined in W.S. 39-17-301(a)(xxxviii) . . . . . $200.00

A ten dollar ($10.00) fee shall be collected for each vehicle identification number or rebuilt salvage vehicle decal inspected pursuant to W.S. 31-2-103(a)(vi) or 31-2-108(d). If a vehicle is presented for inspection of both vehicle identification number and rebuilt salvage vehicle decal at the same time, or both vehicle identification number (VIN) and hull identification number (HIN) or motorboat certificate of number inspection at the same time, only one (1) fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be collected. The fee shall be deposited as follows:

If the inspection is performed by a city or town’s police officer then in the city or town’s general fund;

If the inspection is performed by a county sheriff then in the county’s general fund;

If the inspection is performed by a state trooper then in the state’s general fund;

If the inspection is performed by a law enforcement officer in a state other than Wyoming then in the general fund of the county where application for certificate of title is made; or

If the inspection is performed by game and fish law enforcement personnel pursuant to W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(C)(IV) then in the state’s game and fish fund.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 207, § 3; 1987, ch. 72, § 1; ch. 102, § 1; 1988, ch. 36, § 1; 1989, ch. 7, § 2; ch. 256, § 2; 1994, ch. 71, § 1; 1995, ch. 91, § 1; ch. 127, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 3, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 72, § 2; ch. 183, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 96, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; ch. 46, § 2; ch. 164, § 2; 2013 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 28, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 48, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to fees for commercial vehicles, see § 31-18-201(d).

As to special fuels taxes, see §

39-17-201

et seq.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch. 16, §§ 2 and 4, effective January 1, 2010,
repealed the introductory language of (a)(iv), which read: “Motorcycle dealer or motorcycle manufacturer license plates
. . . . .
$5.00”; deleted “other” following “All” in (a)(v); deleted “or duplicate” following “New” in (a)(vi)(A); added (a)(vi)(C); deleted “including a nontransferable certificate for registration purposes under W.S. 31-2-102(a)(iii)” following “title” in (a)(vii); substituted “31-2-201(n)” for “31-2-201(g)” in (a)(xvi); and repealed (a)(xviii), which read: “Antique vehicle dealer certificate
. . . . .
$250.00.”

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 46, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xx) and (a)(xxi).

The third 2009 amendment, by ch. 164, § 2, effective January 1, 2010, added (a)(xxii).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(vii) substituted “$15.00” for “$9.00;” and in (b) substituted “ten dollar ($10.00)” for “ five dollar ($5.00)” in the first sentence, substituted
“identification” for “inspection,” and substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (b), inserted “or both vehicle identification number (VIN) and hull identification number (HIN) or motorboat certificate of number inspection at the same time”; added (b)(v); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(xxiii).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(xxiii), substituted “An annual” for “For a” and added “registered and licensed” preceding “electric vehicle.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (a)(xix), which read: “Veteran license sticker Cost.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xxiii), added “which shall include the bucking horse and rider emblem” following “annual decal,” and substituted “$200.00” for “$50.00.”

§ 31-3-103.
Distribution of fees; refunds.

Fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-3-101(a)(i) for the registration of Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets pursuant to this act shall be distributed monthly to the county in which each vehicle or fleet is principally located and for the registration of non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets, rental vehicles, utility trailers and rental trucks shall be distributed monthly to the counties in the ratio that the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in each county bears to the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in the state.

Fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-3-101(a)(i) and subsection (a) of this section shall be distributed by county treasurers in the same proportions and manner as property taxes are distributed.

All other fees shall be credited to the state highway fund except as otherwise provided.

Except as otherwise provided no fees shall be refunded unless paid and collected by mistake.

Fifty percent (50%) of the fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vi)(A) through (C) and (xii) shall be distributed to the county general fund in the county where the fees were collected.

One dollar ($1.00) of the fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii) shall be credited to the county abandoned vehicle account created by W.S. 31-13-111(b).

Fees collected by U-Drive-It vehicle or rental vehicle agencies pursuant to W.S.

31-19-105

in excess of registration fees paid on rental vehicles in Wyoming shall be distributed as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) of the fees shall be distributed to the state highway fund;

Fifty percent (50%) of the fees shall be distributed to the counties in the ratio that the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in each county bears to the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in the state.

Of the fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-3-101(a)(ii)(D), seven dollars ($7.00) of each registration shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education program account created by W.S.

31-5-1506

.

Eighty percent (80%) of the fees collected for demo or manufacturer license plates pursuant to W.S. 31-3-102(a)(v) shall be distributed to the state highway fund. Twenty percent (20%) of the fee shall be distributed to the county general fund in the county where the fees were collected.

The fees collected for full use plates pursuant to W.S. 31-3-102(a)(v)(C) shall be distributed by the county treasurers as follows:

Eighty percent (80%) shall be distributed in the same proportions and manner as property taxes are distributed;

Twelve percent (12%) of the fee shall be distributed to the state highway fund;

Eight percent (8%) of the fee shall be distributed to the county general fund in the county where the fees were collected.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1988, ch. 36, § 1; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1993, ch. 27, § 1; 1994, ch. 90, § 2; 1995, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 146, § 2; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; ch. 128, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to state highway fund generally, see §

24-1-119

.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch. 16, effective January 1, 2010, substituted “31-3-102(a)(vi)(A) through (C)” for “31-3-102(a)(vi)(A) and (B)” in (e).

The second amendment, by ch. 128, § 2, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the introductory language of (g), which read: “Fees collected by U-Drive-It motor vehicle or car rental companies pursuant to W.S.

31-3-104

in excess of registration fees paid on trucks or passenger vehicles in Wyoming shall be distributed as follows”.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-3-104.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

31-19-105

by Laws 2009, ch. 128, § 3.

Amended and renumbered effective January 1, 2010. —

This section was amended by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 2, and amended and renumbered by Laws 2009, ch. 128, § 3. The amendment and renumbering by ch. 128 was implemented at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.